Utah statutes.
13-5-6.   Liability of agents.

Any person who, either as director, officer or agent of any firm or corporation or as agent of any person, violating the provisions of this act, assists or aids directly or indirectly, in such violation shall be responsible therefor equally with the person, firm or corporation for whom or for which he acts.



No Change Since 1953

